New York, session 2025-2026, A1592.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 156-d to read as follows: 3 § 156-d. Determination of remaining family member status. 1. Notwith- 4 standing any provisions of law to the contrary, for the purpose of 5 determining whether an individual is a remaining family member entitled 6 to continued occupancy of a housing unit supplied by the New York city 7 housing authority, the standard of proof of residency by such individual 8 for the requisite period shall not exceed the standard required to 9 demonstrate residency by individuals occupying housing units or housing 10 accommodations subject to the provisions of chapters four and five of 11 title twenty-six of the administrative code of the city of New York, 12 chapter two hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred forty- 13 six, constituting the emergency housing rent control law or chapter five 14 hundred seventy-six of the laws of nineteen hundred seventy-four, 15 constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nineteen seventy- 16 four. 17 2. The provisions of this section shall not affect the income thresh- 18 old requirements for determining eligibility of a remaining family 19 member for public housing. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 21 applications for continued occupancy of a housing unit supplied by the 22 New York city housing authority submitted to such authority on or after 23 January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04663-01-5